North Carolina, session 2025, SB510.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-164.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(136) Menstrual products. – Tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups, sanitary
napkins, and other similar tangible personal property designed for feminine
hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-164.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.13. Retail sales and use tax.
The sale at retail and the use, storage, or consumption in this State of the following items are
specifically exempted from the tax imposed by this Article:
…
(76) Menstrual products."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to sales made
on or after that date.
*S510-v-1*